Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6402
Qualified judgment, defined.

For purposes of the Qualified Judgment Payment Act, qualified judgment means a judgment that is rendered against a county by a federal court for a violation of federal law.

Laws 2019, LB472, § 2.
January 1, 2027